Nevada, session 83, SB342.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 533.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
533.030 1. Subject to existing rights, and except as otherwise
provided in this section and NRS 533.0241, 533.027 and 533.028,
and section 5 of this act, all water may be appropriated for
beneficial use as provided in this chapter and not otherwise.
2. The use of water, from any stream system as provided in this
chapter and from underground water as provided in NRS 534.080,
for any recreational purpose, or the use of water from the Muddy
River or the Virgin River to create any developed shortage supply or
intentionally created surplus, is hereby declared to be a beneficial
use. As used in this subsection:
(a) “Developed shortage supply” has the meaning ascribed to it
in Volume 73 of the Federal Register at page 19884, April 11, 2008,
and any subsequent amendment thereto.
(b) “Intentionally created surplus” has the meaning ascribed to it
in Volume 73 of the Federal Register at page 19884, April 11, 2008,
and any subsequent amendment thereto.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, in any county
whose population is 700,000 or more:
(a) The board of county commissioners may prohibit or restrict
by ordinance the use of water and effluent for recreational purposes
in any artificially created lake or stream located within the
unincorporated areas of the county.
(b) The governing body of a city may prohibit or restrict by
ordinance the use of water and effluent for recreational purposes in
any artificially created lake or stream located within the boundaries
of the city.
4. In any county whose population is 700,000 or more, the
provisions of subsection 1 and of any ordinance adopted pursuant to
subsection 3 do not apply to:
(a) Water stored in an artificially created reservoir for use in
flood control, in meeting peak water demands or for purposes
relating to the treatment of sewage;
(b) Water used in a mining reclamation project; or
-
*SB342*

– 3 –
(c) A body of water located in a recreational facility that is open
to the public and owned or operated by the United States or the State
of Nevada.
Sec. 2. NRS 533.370 is hereby amended to read as follows:
533.370 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 533.0241, 533.345, 533.371, 533.372 and 533.503, and
section 5 of this act, the State Engineer shall approve an application
submitted in proper form which contemplates the application of
water to beneficial use if:
(a) The application is accompanied by the prescribed fees;
(b) The proposed use or change, if within an irrigation district,
does not adversely affect the cost of water for other holders of water
rights in the district or lessen the efficiency of the district in its
delivery or use of water; and
(c) The applicant provides proof satisfactory to the State
Engineer of the applicant’s:
(1) Intention in good faith to construct any work necessary to
apply the water to the intended beneficial use with reasonable
diligence; and
(2) Financial ability and reasonable expectation actually to
construct the work and apply the water to the intended beneficial use
with reasonable diligence.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 10, [where there]
the State Engineer shall reject an application and refuse to issue
the requested permit if:
(a) There is no unappropriated water in the proposed source of
supply [, where the] ;
(b) The groundwater that has not been committed for use has
been reserved pursuant to NRS 533.0241 ;
(c) The groundwater rights have been retired pursuant to
section 5 of this act; or [where its]
(d) The proposed use or change conflicts with existing rights or
with protectable interests in existing domestic wells as set forth in
NRS 533.024, or threatens to prove detrimental to the public
interest, the State Engineer shall reject the application and refuse to
issue the requested permit.
 If a previous application for a similar use of water within the
same basin has been rejected on those grounds, the new application
may be denied without publication.
3. In addition to the criteria set forth in subsections 1 and 2, in
determining whether an application for an interbasin transfer of
groundwater must be rejected pursuant to this section, the State
Engineer shall consider:
(a) Whether the applicant has justified the need to import the
water from another basin;
-
*SB342*

– 4 –
(b) If the State Engineer determines that a plan for conservation
of water is advisable for the basin into which the water is to be
imported, whether the applicant has demonstrated that such a plan
has been adopted and is being effectively carried out;
(c) Whether the proposed action is environmentally sound as it
relates to the basin from which the water is exported;
(d) Whether the proposed action is an appropriate long-term use
which will not unduly limit the future growth and development in
the basin from which the water is exported; and
(e) Any other factor the State Engineer determines to be
relevant.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and
subsections 6 and 10 and NRS 533.365, the State Engineer shall
approve or reject each application within 2 years after the final date
for filing a protest. The State Engineer may postpone action:
(a) Upon written authorization to do so by the applicant.
(b) If an application is protested.
(c) If the purpose for which the application was made is
municipal use.
(d) In areas where studies of water supplies have been
determined to be necessary by the State Engineer pursuant to
NRS 533.368.
(e) Where court actions or adjudications are pending, which may
affect the outcome of the application.
(f) In areas in which adjudication of vested water rights is
deemed necessary by the State Engineer.
(g) On an application for a permit to change a vested water right
in a basin where vested water rights have not been adjudicated.
(h) Where authorized entry to any land needed to use the water
for which the application is submitted is required from a
governmental agency.
(i) On an application for which the State Engineer has required
additional information pursuant to NRS 533.375.
5. If the State Engineer does not act upon an application in
accordance with subsections 4 and 6, the application remains active
until approved or rejected by the State Engineer.
6. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and
subsection 10, the State Engineer shall approve or reject, within 6
months after the final date for filing a protest, an application filed to
change the point of diversion of water already appropriated when
the existing and proposed points of diversion are on the same
property for which the water has already been appropriated under
the existing water right or the proposed point of diversion is on real
property that is proven to be owned by the applicant and is
contiguous to the place of use of the existing water right. The State
-
*SB342*

– 5 –
Engineer may postpone action on the application pursuant to
subsection 4.
7. If the State Engineer has not approved, rejected or held a
hearing on an application within 7 years after the final date for filing
a protest, the State Engineer shall cause notice of the application to
be republished and reposted pursuant to NRS 533.360 immediately
preceding the time at which the State Engineer is ready to approve
or reject the application. The cost of the republication must be paid
by the applicant. After such republication and reposting, a protest
may be filed in accordance with NRS 533.365.
8. If a hearing is held regarding an application, the decision of
the State Engineer must be in writing and include findings of fact,
conclusions of law and a statement of the underlying facts
supporting the findings of fact. The written decision may take the
form of a transcription of an oral ruling. The rejection or approval of
an application must be endorsed on a copy of the original
application, and a record must be made of the endorsement in the
records of the State Engineer. The copy of the application so
endorsed must be returned to the applicant. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection 11, if the application is approved, the
applicant may, on receipt thereof, proceed with the construction of
the necessary works and take all steps required to apply the water to
beneficial use and to perfect the proposed appropriation. If the
application is rejected, the applicant may take no steps toward the
prosecution of the proposed work or the diversion and use of
the public water while the rejection continues in force.
9. If a person is the successor in interest of an owner of a water
right or an owner of real property upon which a domestic well is
located and if the former owner of the water right or real property on
which a domestic well is located had previously filed a written
protest against the granting of an application, the successor in
interest must be allowed to pursue that protest in the same manner
as if the successor in interest were the former owner whose interest
he or she succeeded. If the successor in interest wishes to pursue the
protest, the successor in interest must notify the State Engineer in a
timely manner on a form provided by the State Engineer.
10. The provisions of subsections 1 to 9, inclusive, do not
apply to an application for an environmental permit or a temporary
permit issued pursuant to NRS 533.436 or 533.504.
11. The provisions of subsection 8 do not authorize the
recipient of an approved application to use any state land
administered by the Division of State Lands of the State Department
of Conservation and Natural Resources without the appropriate
authorization for that use from the State Land Registrar.
-
*SB342*

– 6 –
12. As used in this section, “domestic well” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 534.350.
Sec. 3. NRS 533.371 is hereby amended to read as follows:
533.371 The State Engineer shall reject the application and
refuse to issue a permit to appropriate water for a specified period if
the State Engineer determines that:
1. The application is incomplete;
2. The prescribed fees have not been paid;
3. The proposed use is not temporary;
4. There is no water available from the proposed source of
supply without exceeding the perennial yield or safe yield of that
source;
5. The groundwater that has not been committed for use from
the proposed source of supply has been reserved pursuant to
NRS 533.0241;
6. The groundwater rights have been retired pursuant to
section 5 of this act;
7. The proposed use conflicts with existing rights; or
[7.] 8. The proposed use threatens to prove detrimental to the
public interest.
Sec. 4. NRS 533.395 is hereby amended to read as follows:
533.395 1. If, at any time in the judgment of the State
Engineer, the holder of any permit to appropriate the public water is
not proceeding in good faith and with reasonable diligence to
perfect the appropriation, the State Engineer shall require the
submission of such proof and evidence as may be necessary to show
a compliance with the law. If, in the judgment of the State Engineer,
the holder of a permit is not proceeding in good faith and with
reasonable diligence to perfect the appropriation, the State Engineer
shall cancel the permit, and advise the holder of its cancellation. The
failure to provide the proof and evidence required pursuant to this
subsection is prima facie evidence that the holder is not proceeding
in good faith and with reasonable diligence to perfect the
appropriation.
2. If any permit is cancelled under the provisions of this section
or NRS 533.390 or 533.410, the holder of the permit may within 60
days of the cancellation of the permit file a written petition with the
State Engineer requesting a review of the cancellation by the State
Engineer at a public hearing. The State Engineer may, after
receiving and considering evidence, affirm, modify or rescind the
cancellation.
3. If the decision of the State Engineer modifies or rescinds the
cancellation of a permit, the effective date of the appropriation
under the permit is vacated and replaced by the date of the filing of
the written petition with the State Engineer. The provisions of this
-
*SB342*

– 7 –
subsection do not apply to a permit which was cancelled for a
failure to timely file a document relating to the permit.
4. The cancellation of a permit may not be reviewed or be the
subject of any judicial proceedings unless a written petition for
review has been filed and the cancellation has been affirmed,
modified or rescinded pursuant to subsection 2.
5. For the purposes of this section, the measure of reasonable
diligence is the steady application of effort to perfect the
appropriation in a reasonably expedient and efficient manner under
all the facts and circumstances. When a project or integrated system
is comprised of several features, work on one feature of the project
or system may be considered in finding that reasonable diligence
has been shown in the development of water rights for all features of
the entire project or system.
6. The appropriation of water or the acquisition or lease of
appropriated water from any:
(a) Stream system as provided for in this chapter; or
(b) Underground water as provided for in NRS 534.080,
 by a political subdivision of this State or a public utility, as
defined in NRS 704.020, to serve the present or the reasonably
anticipated future municipal, industrial or domestic needs of its
customers for water, as determined in accordance with a master plan
adopted pursuant to chapter 278 of NRS or a plan approved by the
State Engineer, must be considered when reviewing an extension of
time.
Sec. 5. Chapter 534 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
In each area designated as a groundwater basin by the State
Engineer pursuant to the provisions of NRS 534.030, the State
Engineer may coordinate with persons who seek to relinquish, by
contract or other legal agreement, a right to appropriate water.
The State Engineer must retire any water right relinquished
pursuant to such a contract or other legal agreement.
H
-
*SB342*